Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1516.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 3606, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3606. A. Any person of competent legal capacity may
contract for insurance.
B. A minor not less than fifteen (15) sixteen (16) years of age
as at nearest birthday may, notwithstanding such minority and with
signed parental or guardian consent, contract for life or accident
and health insurance on his or her own life or body or the life or
body of any person in whom he or she has an insurable interest, for
his or her own benefit or for the benefit of his or her father or
mother, spouse, child, brother, sister or grandparents. Such a
minor shall, notwithstanding such minority, be deemed competent to
exercise all rights and powers with respect to or under any contract
of life or accident and health insurance on his or her own life or
body or with respect to or under any contract such minor effected on
the life or body of any person in whom he or she has an insurable
interest, as though of full legal age, and may surrender his or her
interest therein and give a valid discharge for any benefit accruing
or money payable thereunder. The minor shall not, by reason of his
or her minority, be entitled to rescind, avoid or repudiate the
contract, nor to rescind, avoid or repudiate any exercise of a right

or privilege thereunder, except that such minor, not otherwise
emancipated, shall not be bound by any unperformed agreement to pay,
by promissory note or otherwise, any premium on any such insurance
contract.
C. A minor not less than sixteen (16) years of age may,
notwithstanding such minority and with signed parental or guardian
consent, contract for insurance on other subjects of insurance in
which he or she has an insurable interest. A minor shall be bound
by any settlement made in connection with any insurance contract so
issued. The minor shall not, by reason of his or her minority, be
entitled to rescind, avoid or repudiate the contract, nor to
rescind, avoid or repudiate any exercise of a right or privilege
thereunder, except that such minor, not otherwise emancipated, shall
not be bound by any unperformed agreement to pay, by promissory note
or otherwise, any premium on any such insurance contract.
D. Liability for failure to obtain signed parental or guardian
consent under subsections B and C of this section shall not rest
upon the insurance agent from whom the insurance policy was
purchased.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1516 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 17th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1516 Page 3